District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.07

Defense of ultra vires.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 182, ch. 269, § 7
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 1
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(b), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.07.
1981 Ed., § 29-307.
1973 Ed., § 29-905.